District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Support for the Capital Pride Parade Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 47-2826 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by adding
a new subsection (f) to read as follows:
“(f) The Mayor shall waive all fees for the costs of services, as determined by the Mayor,
incurred by the city for administering the special annual events known as the Capital Pride
Parade, Festival, and Block Party; provided, that any expediting fees or penalties incurred by the
host shall not be waived. Fees waived shall include:
“(1) Special Event User Fees required by the Department of Licensing and
Consumer Protection;

“(2) Special Event User Fees and other fees required by the Metropolitan Police
Department;
“(3) Special Event User Fees and other fees required by the Alcoholic Beverage
and Cannabis Administration;
“(4) On-site permitting and monitoring inspectors, on-site monitoring fees,
Advanced Life Support Units, EMS bicycle teams and ambulance carts, use of trucks, and other
fees required by the Department of Fire and Emergency Medical Services;
“(5) Food vendor inspection fees and other fees required by the Department of
Health;
“(6) Clean-up prior to and after the event, trash removal, towing services, and
other fees required by the Department of Public Works; and
“(7) Flag installation and removal, traffic control officer assistance, variable
message boards, and other fees required by the Department of Transportation.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code §1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.